Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska85-1911
Awards; how made.

The
Nebraska Opportunity Grant Act shall
provide for awards made directly to eligible students based on financial need.

Laws 2003, LB 574, § 11;

Laws 2010, LB956, § 10.